Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 6. Special Funds.

Sec. 37.05.500.
Special funds.

The following funds shall be treated for accounting purposes as accounts in the general fund:

special revolving fund — surplus property (AS

44.68.130(c)

);

the vocational rehabilitation small business enterprise revolving fund (AS

23.15.130

).

There shall be created in the general fund for each of the funds designated in (a) of this section a reserve equal to the excess of revenue received by each fund over expenditures made from that fund.

History.

(§ 1 ch 5 SLA 1968; am § 49 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 92 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 37.05.155. Renumbered as AS

37.05.151

in 1986. Renumbered again in 1988. Paragraphs (a)(1) and (2) were renumbered in 2012 to reflect the prior repeals of (a)(1), (3), (4), and (6).

Opinions of attorney general. —

The general fund is not specifically created by statute. Its existence is noted in this section which provides that certain enumerated funds shall be treated for accounting purposes as accounts in the general fund. 1969 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 5.

The general fund in Alaska consists of money received from state taxes and licenses and money received from non-tax or license sources, such as oil and gas royalty payments. 1969 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 5.

All public moneys and revenue coming into the state treasury constitute the general fund of the state. 1969 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 5.

Sec. 37.05.510.
Working reserve account.

There is established in the general fund a working reserve account. The working reserve account consists of amounts appropriated to state agencies for

cash payment of accrued leave;

cash payment of terminal leave;

payment of the employer’s contribution for unemployment benefits of former employees; and

payment of claims for workers’ compensation and general liability.

The Department of Administration shall allocate to the working reserve account amounts appropriated to all state agencies for the benefits set out in (a) of this section after the appropriation Act implementing the state operating budget is enacted. The department shall charge the reserve account with all payments for the benefits set out in (a) of this section. If payments for a fiscal year exceed the unexpended balance of appropriations allocated to the account, the department may, except for payments under (a)(4) of this section, pay those benefits by charging the unencumbered balance of any appropriation enacted to finance the payment of employee salaries and benefits that is determined to be available for lapse at the end of the fiscal year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 17 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

37.05.156

. Renumbered as AS

37.05.152

in 1986. Renumbered again in 1988.

Sec. 37.05.520.
Railbelt energy fund.

There is established in the general fund the Railbelt energy fund. The fund consists of money appropriated to it by the legislature and interest received on money in the fund. The department of revenue shall manage the fund. The legislature may appropriate money from the fund for programs, projects, and other expenditures to assist in meeting Railbelt energy needs, including projects for retrofitting state-owned buildings and facilities for energy conservation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 18 SLA 1993; am § 3 ch 60 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.25.050. Renumbered as AS

37.05.153

in 1986. Renumbered again in 1988.

Sec. 37.05.530.
National Petroleum Reserve — Alaska special revenue fund.

The National Petroleum Reserve — Alaska special revenue fund is established. The fund consists of all money disbursed to the state by the federal government under 42 U.S.C. 6506a(l) and former 42 U.S.C. 6508 (P.L. 96-514) since December 12, 1980, less the amount deposited in the general fund and expended by the state by general fund appropriations before June 9, 1984.

The commissioner of revenue shall manage the National Petroleum Reserve — Alaska special revenue fund.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall adopt regulations under which municipalities impacted by National Petroleum Reserve — Alaska oil and gas development under 42 U.S.C. 6506a or former 42 U.S.C. 6508 may apply for and be eligible to receive grants to alleviate the impact. The department shall give priority in the allocation of grants to municipalities that are experiencing or will experience the most direct or severe impact from oil and gas development under 42 U.S.C. 6506a or former 42 U.S.C. 6508 within the National Petroleum Reserve — Alaska. The department shall fund all meritorious grant applications out of the money appropriated to it each year. Within 10 days after the convening of each regular session of the legislature, the department shall submit to the legislature a list of all municipalities that have received grants, a list of all municipalities determined by the department to be eligible for further grants, a recommendation of the amount of money to be granted for those additional applications, and written justification of each past and potential grant.

It is the intent of the legislature that each year all of the money in the National Petroleum Reserve — Alaska special revenue fund be made available for appropriation by the legislature to municipalities that demonstrate under (c) of this section present impact, or the need to determine or plan for future impact, from oil and gas development under 42 U.S.C. 6506a or former 42 U.S.C. 6508. It is the intent of the legislature that an initial appropriation be made to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development to cover anticipated impact grants, and that additional funds be made available through supplemental appropriations if the impact is greater than anticipated and the legislature considers the additional grants proposed by the department to be meritorious.

A municipality may use the funds received under (d) of this section only for the following activities and services to alleviate the impact of the oil and gas development under 42 U.S.C. 6506a or former 42 U.S.C. 6508 within the National Petroleum Reserve — Alaska:

planning;

construction, maintenance, and operation of essential public facilities by the municipality; and

other necessary public services provided by the municipality.

Funds appropriated under (d) of this section may not be used for the retirement of municipal debt.

The provisions of this subsection apply to amounts received by the state under 42 U.S.C. 6506a(l) or former 42 U.S.C. 6508, as follows:

amounts received and not appropriated for grants to municipalities under (d) of this section shall be deposited at the end of each fiscal year as follows:

25 percent of amounts received by the state during that fiscal year under 42 U.S.C. 6506a(l) or former 42 U.S.C. 6508 to the principal of the Alaska permanent fund; and

.5 percent of amounts received by the state during that fiscal year under 42 U.S.C. 6506a(l) or former 42 U.S.C. 6508 to the public school trust fund (AS

37.14.110

);

if, after making the grants under (d) of this section, the amounts remaining are insufficient to make payment in full of the deposits required by (1)(A) and (B) of this subsection, the deposits shall be allocated pro rata between the fund deposits;

the amounts remaining after the making of the payment of the deposits in full to the Alaska permanent fund and the public school trust fund under (2) of this subsection may be appropriated

first, to each of the funds described in (1)(A) and (B) of this subsection to recover amounts not paid to those funds on or after September 1, 2006, because of deficiencies in making the payments required by (2) of this subsection; and

after appropriations authorized by (A) of this paragraph, to the power cost equalization and rural electric capitalization fund (AS

42.45.100

);

the amounts remaining after any appropriation to the power cost equalization and rural electric capitalization fund shall lapse into the general fund for use by the state for the following facilities and services: planning; construction, maintenance, and operation of essential public facilities; and other necessary public services.

In making appropriations from the National Petroleum Reserve — Alaska special revenue fund, the legislature shall identify the grants for activities, services, and facilities as capital appropriation items and shall specify the amounts for each item. Notwithstanding other provisions of law and unless expressly provided by the legislature in the appropriation item making the appropriation, an appropriation from the National Petroleum Reserve — Alaska special revenue fund shall, for the purposes of determining the funding sources for the appropriation be treated as though the appropriation takes effect in the fiscal year in which the appropriation passes the legislature. The authorization to expend funds appropriated from the fund shall take effect as otherwise provided by law.

History.

(§ 2 ch 94 SLA 1984; am §§ 2, 3 ch 53 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 59 SLA 1992; am § 32 ch 32 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 93 SLA 1999; am §§ 27 — 31 ch 12 SLA 2006; am §§ 1, 2 ch 55 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

37.25.040

. Renumbered in 1988.

In 1999, in (c) of this section, “Community and Economic Development” was substituted for “Community and Regional Affairs” in accordance with § 91(a)(9), ch. 58, SLA 1999, and, in (d) of this section, “Community and Economic Development” was substituted for “Community and Regional Affairs” to correct a manifest error in enactment by the omission of reference to AS

37.05.530(d)

in § 91(a)(9), ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (c) and (d) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings in connection with the 1984 and 1986 Acts, see § 1, ch. 94, SLA 1984, and § 1, ch. 53, SLA 1986, respectively, in the Temporary and Special Acts; for legislative purpose in connection with the enactment of (h) of this section, see § 1, ch. 59, SLA 1992 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for allocation of NPR-A impact assistance, see 3 AAC 150, art. 3.

Sec. 37.05.540.
Budget reserve fund; appropriation limit.

There is established as a separate fund in the state treasury the budget reserve fund. The budget reserve fund consists of appropriations to the fund. Money received by the state that is subject to the appropriation limit under (b) of this section and that exceeds that limit, may be appropriated to the budget reserve fund.

Except for appropriations to the permanent fund or for Alaska permanent fund dividends, appropriations to the budget reserve fund, appropriations of revenue bond proceeds, appropriations required to pay the principal and interest on general obligation bonds, and appropriations of money received from a nonstate source in trust for a specific purpose, including revenue of a public enterprise or public corporation of the state that issues revenue bonds, appropriations from the mental health trust settlement income account (AS

37.14.036

), and appropriations made to the mental health trust fund (AS

37.14.031

), appropriations from the treasury made in a fiscal year may not exceed appropriations made in the preceding fiscal year by more than five percent plus the change in population and inflation since the beginning of the preceding fiscal year. For purposes of applying this limit an appropriation is considered to be made in the fiscal year in which it is enacted and a reappropriation remains attributed to the fiscal year in which the original appropriation is enacted. The determination of the change in population for purposes of this subsection shall be based on an annual estimate of population by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. The determination of the change in inflation for purposes of this subsection shall be based on the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for Anchorage prepared by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics. The amount of money received by the state that is subject to the appropriation limit includes the balance in the general fund carried forward from the preceding fiscal year.

If the legislature determines that the money subject to the appropriation limit received by the state in a fiscal year is less than the maximum permitted to be appropriated under (b) of this section, up to 25 percent of the balance of the budget reserve fund may be appropriated to the general fund.

The Department of Revenue shall manage and invest assets of the budget reserve fund in the manner set out for the management and investment of the assets of the general fund under AS

37.10.070

. Income from investment of the budget reserve fund may be appropriated to the fund each year by law.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, appropriations may be made from the budget reserve fund needed by the governor to meet a disaster. In this subsection, “disaster” has the meaning given in AS

26.23.900

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1986; am § 6 ch 66 SLA 1991)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

37.05.156

. Renumbered in 1988.

In 1996, in subsection (b) of this section, “mental health trust settlement income account” was substituted for “mental health trust income account” pursuant to sec. 17, ch. 1, SSSLA 1994.

In 1999, in (b) of this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to read “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Article IX, section 17 of the Alaska constitution did not repeal the statutory budget reserve fund established by this section and the statutory fund continues in effect until amended or repealed by the legislature. 1992 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 1.

Sec. 37.05.550.
Alaska marine highway system vessel replacement fund.

There is in the general fund the Alaska marine highway system vessel replacement fund. The fund consists of money appropriated to it by the legislature. Money appropriated to the fund does not lapse. The Department of Revenue shall manage the fund. Interest received on money in the fund shall be accounted for separately and may be appropriated into the fund annually. The legislature may appropriate money from the fund for refurbishment of existing state ferry vessels, acquisition of additional state ferry vessels, or replacement of retired or outmoded state ferry vessels.

The legislature may appropriate to the fund money received by the state as Alaska marine highway system program receipts or from a settlement or final judicial determination of the Dinkum Sands case (United States v. Alaska) and the North Slope royalty case (State v. Amerada Hess, et al.) and not deposited into the Alaska permanent fund under AS

37.13.010(a)(1)

or (2) or into the public school trust fund under AS

37.14.150

.

The Department of Revenue shall prepare a written report, no later than the 10th legislative day of each regular legislative session, regarding the earnings of the Alaska marine highway system vessel replacement fund during the prior fiscal year and projected earnings of the Alaska marine highway system vessel replacement fund for the current fiscal year and the next fiscal year. The Department of Revenue shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

History.

(§ 1 ch 145 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 62 SLA 1992; am § 59 ch 21 SLA 1995; am §§ 1, 2 ch 22 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

For Alaska Marine Highway System Fund and budget, see AS

19.65.050

—

19.65.100

.

Sec. 37.05.555.
University of Alaska building fund.

The University of Alaska building fund is created as a special account in the general fund. The fund consists of

payments made to the University of Alaska by a public or private occupant of a covered building under an agreement with the University of Alaska for costs of the occupant’s use and occupancy of building space; and

appropriations to the fund.

The legislature may appropriate, annually and under AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act), amounts from the University of Alaska building fund to the University of Alaska to pay the costs of use, management, operation, maintenance, and depreciation related to space in covered buildings managed under an agreement with the University of Alaska.

Appropriations to the University of Alaska building fund are not one-year appropriations and do not lapse under AS

37.25.010

.

The unexpended and unobligated balance of an appropriation from the University of Alaska building fund lapses into the University of Alaska building fund at the end of the fiscal year for which it was appropriated.

Nothing in this section exempts money deposited into the University of Alaska building fund from the requirements of AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act) or dedicates that money for a specific purpose.

In this section, “covered building” means a building owned by the University of Alaska and designated by the Board of Regents as a covered building.

History.

(§ 2 ch 23 SLA 2014)

Sec. 37.05.560.
Educational facilities maintenance and construction fund.

The educational facilities maintenance and construction fund is established as a separate fund in the general fund. The fund consists of all money appropriated to it.

The educational facilities maintenance and construction fund shall be invested by the Department of Revenue so as to yield competitive market rates, as provided in AS

37.10.071

. Money in the fund may be appropriated

to finance the design, construction, and maintenance of public school facilities; and

for maintenance of University of Alaska facilities.

Appropriations from the education facilities maintenance and construction fund are subject to AS

14.11.008

.

History.

(§ 19 ch 78 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

37.16.010

. Renumbered in 1993.

Sec. 37.05.565.
Alaska capital income fund.

There is established in the general fund the Alaska capital income fund consisting of money deposited to the fund under AS

37.13.145(d)

and of appropriations to the fund. The fund shall be invested by the Department of Revenue to yield competitive market rates as provided in AS

37.10.071

. Income earned on money in the fund may be appropriated to the fund.

Money may be appropriated from the Alaska capital income fund for state facilities preventive or deferred maintenance, including replacement of parts, systems, or components, or other activities needed to preserve or maintain state assets, and to cover annual debt service and reserves for debt service on bonds authorized by state law. Nothing in this subsection creates a dedicated fund.

History.

(§ 1 ch 49 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective November 20, 2018, in (b), substituted “for state facilities preventive or deferred maintenance, including replacement of parts, systems, or components, or other activities needed to preserve or maintain state assets and” for “for any public purpose, including”.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 49, SLA 2005 (HB 187), relating to establishment of the Alaska capital income fund, see 2005 House Journal 450 — 451, where the bill is erroneously identified as HB 188.
2005 House Journal 578 — 579 notes the correction.

Sec. 37.05.570.
Alaska public building fund.

There is created as a special account in the general fund the Alaska public building fund into which shall be deposited

payments made to the Department of Administration by a public or private occupant of a covered building under an agreement with the Department of Administration for costs of the occupant’s use and occupancy of building space; and

appropriations to the Alaska public building fund.

Beginning with the appropriations for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2000, on an annual basis and under AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act), the legislature may appropriate amounts from the Alaska public building fund to the Department of Administration to pay use, management, operation, maintenance, and depreciation costs related to space of covered buildings managed under an agreement with the Department of Administration.

Appropriations to the Alaska public building fund are not one-year appropriations and do not lapse under AS

37.25.010

.

The unexpended and unobligated balance of an appropriation from the Alaska public building fund lapses into the Alaska public building fund at the end of the fiscal year for which it was appropriated.

Nothing in this section exempts money deposited into the Alaska public building fund from the requirements of AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act) or dedicates that money for a specific purpose.

In this section, “covered building” means any building owned by the state for which the responsibility for operation, maintenance, and management has been assigned to the Department of Administration.

History.

(§ 1 ch 19 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 2002)

Sec. 37.05.580.
Tobacco use education and cessation fund.

There is created as a special account in the general fund the tobacco use education and cessation fund into which shall be deposited 20 percent annually of the revenue derived from the settlement of State of Alaska v. Philip Morris, Incorporated, et al, No. 1JU-97-915 CI (Alaska Super. 1997). The purpose of the tobacco use education and cessation fund is to provide a source to finance the comprehensive smoking education, tobacco use prevention, and tobacco control program authorized by AS

44.29.020(a)(14)

.

The legislature may make appropriations from the tobacco use education and cessation fund for the comprehensive smoking education, tobacco use prevention, and tobacco control program established under AS

44.29.020(a)(14)

.

Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2005, in subsections (a) and (b), “AS

44.29.020(a)(14)

” was substituted for “AS

44.29.020(a)(15)

” to reflect the 2004 renumbering of paragraphs in AS

44.29.020(a)

.

Cross references. —

For additional provisions relating to the right to receive revenue from the settlement of

Alaska v. Philip Morris, Inc.

, No. 1JU-97-915 Civ. (First Jud. Dist. at Juneau), see §§ 9 and 10, ch. 130, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary and Special Acts and § 3, ch. 96, SLA 2001 in the 2001 Temporary and Special Acts.

AS

43.50.190

(d) provides for a deposit of a portion of the annual proceeds of the tax levied under AS

43.50.190

to the fund established in this section.

Sec. 37.05.590.
Civil legal services fund.

The civil legal services fund is established as a special account in the general fund. The fund consists of appropriations to it. Annually, the legislature may appropriate to the fund only from amounts deposited into the general fund of the state under AS

09.17.020(j)

and an amount from the general fund that is up to 10 percent of the filing fees received by the Alaska Court System during the previous closed fiscal year. The legislature may make appropriations from the fund to organizations that provide civil legal services to low-income individuals. Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund. In this section, “low-income individual” means an individual with an income equal to or less than 125 percent of the most recent federal poverty guidelines for Alaska set by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

History.

(§ 2 ch 63 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2009, under AS

01.05.031

, the revisor of statutes substituted “may appropriate to the fund only from amounts” for “may only appropriate to the fund from amounts” in order to correct a grammatical error.

Cross references. —

For federal poverty guidelines, see aspe.hhs.gov/poverty-guidelines.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective November 20, 2018, added “and an amount from the general fund that is up to 10 percent of the filing fees received by the Alaska Court System during the previous closed fiscal year” at the end of the third sentence.

Sec. 37.05.600.
Alaska veterans’ cemetery fund.

There is created as a special account in the general fund the Alaska veterans’ cemetery fund into which shall be deposited appropriations to the Alaska veterans’ cemetery fund.

Beginning with the appropriations for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2008, on an annual basis and under AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act), the legislature may appropriate amounts from the Alaska veterans’ cemetery fund to the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs for the construction, operation, and maintenance of the Alaska veterans’ cemeteries established under AS

44.35.035

.

Appropriations to the Alaska veterans’ cemetery fund are not one-year appropriations and do not lapse under AS

37.25.010

.

The unexpended and unobligated balance of an appropriation from the Alaska veterans’ cemetery fund lapses into the Alaska veterans’ cemetery fund at the end of the fiscal year for which it was appropriated.

Nothing in this section exempts money deposited into the Alaska veterans’ cemetery fund from the requirements of AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act) or dedicates that money for a specific purpose.

History.

(§ 4 ch 21 SLA 2009)

Sec. 37.05.610.
Alaska affordable energy fund.

The Alaska affordable energy fund is created as a special account in the general fund. The fund consists of the amount determined and deposited in the fund under (b) of this section and interest earned on the fund balance. The purpose of the fund is to provide a source from which the legislature may appropriate money to develop infrastructure to deliver energy to areas of the state that are not expected to have or do not have direct access to a North Slope natural gas pipeline.

The amount to be deposited in (a) of this section is 20 percent of the revenue received from the state’s royalty gas transported in an Alaska liquefied natural gas project that remains after the payment to the Alaska permanent fund under AS

37.13.010

.

The legislature may make appropriations from the Alaska affordable energy fund for the purpose described in (a) of this section.

Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

In this section,

“Alaska liquefied natural gas project” has the meaning given in AS

31.25.390

;

“North Slope natural gas pipeline” has the meaning given in AS

42.06.630

.

History.

(§ 23 ch 14 SLA 2014)